Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 61. Air Ambulance Membership Agreements.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 13, SLA 2014 makes this chapter effective April 24, 2014.

Sec. 21.61.100.
Air ambulance membership agreement.

An air ambulance service provider that meets the requirements of AS

21.61.105

may offer an air ambulance membership agreement.

The term of an air ambulance membership agreement may not exceed one year, but may be renewed annually.

An air ambulance membership agreement may not include a provision that requires an air ambulance service provider to pay for or indemnify a person for services provided by a third party, including a third party that is another air ambulance service provider.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2014)

Sec. 21.61.105.
Registration of air ambulance service providers.

An air ambulance service provider that offers an air ambulance membership agreement shall register biennially with the director on a form prescribed by the director.

At the time of registration, an air ambulance service provider shall supply the director with evidence that the air ambulance service provider

has been certified as meeting the minimum standards prescribed by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

18.08.082(a)(3)

; and

has been in operation in the state for at least two years, or meets solvency requirements established by the director in regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2014)

Sec. 21.61.106.
Other provisions applicable.

In addition to the provisions of this chapter, the following provisions of this title apply to air ambulance service providers and air ambulance membership agreements to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this chapter and the reasonable implications of the express provisions:

AS 21.36;

AS 21.42.

When applying the provisions listed in (a) of this section, the director shall treat an air ambulance service provider as an insurer and an air ambulance membership agreement as an excepted benefits insurance policy under AS

21.54.160

.

Except as provided in this section, an air ambulance service provider or an air ambulance membership agreement that complies with this chapter is not otherwise subject to this title.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2014)

Sec. 21.61.109.
Regulations.

The director may adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2014)

Sec. 21.61.110.
Definitions.

In AS

21.61.100

—

21.61.110

,

“air ambulance” means a publicly or privately owned aircraft intended to be used and maintained or operated to provide critical care ambulance services, air medevacs, and medevac services for the transportation of individuals who are sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise helpless;

“air ambulance membership agreement” means an agreement in exchange for consideration, to pay for, indemnify, or provide an amount or benefit to a person for the cost of air ambulance services;

“air ambulance service provider” means a person that owns or operates an air ambulance;

“consideration” means a membership fee, receipt of insurance proceeds, performance of a service, waiver of a right, or anything of value.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2014)